Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.080

Findings, conclusions, and recommended decision of the director—Notification—Final decision.

(1) The director shall make findings upon material points controverted at the hearing and required by this chapter and upon such other matters and things as he or she may deem fitting and proper. Based upon those findings, the director shall make conclusions and develop and issue a recommended decision. The findings, conclusions, and recommended decision, and the full text of the proposal shall be posted on the department's website. For amendment and termination petitions, the affected commission may include a link on its website to the department's website.

(2) The recommended decision may deny or approve the proposal in its entirety, or it may recommend a marketing order containing other or different terms or conditions from those contained in the proposal: PROVIDED, That the same shall be of a kind or type substantially within the purview of the notice of hearing and shall be supported by evidence taken at the hearing or by documents of which the director is authorized to take official notice. The director shall not approve the issuance, amendment, or termination of any marketing order unless he or she shall find with respect thereto:

(a) That the proposed issuance, amendment or termination thereof is reasonably calculated to attain the objective sought in such marketing order;

(b) That the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination is in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and within the applicable limitations and restrictions set forth therein will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter;

(c) That the interests of consumers of such commodity are protected in that the powers of this chapter are being exercised only to the extent necessary to attain such objectives.

(3) If the director's recommended decision does not make any changes to the proposal, notification will be made by mail in the form of a postcard reciting the director's recommended decision. The postcard will also include the department's website address where any person can access the full text of the director's findings, conclusions, and recommended decision.

(4) If the director's recommended decision makes changes to the proposal or does not support the proposal, notification will be made by mail in the form of a letter describing the changes made or explaining the reason for not supporting the proposal and a referendum. The letter will also include the department's website address where any person can access the full text of the director's findings, conclusions, and recommended decision.

(5) After the director issues his or her findings, conclusions, and recommended decision all interested parties shall have a period of not less than fifteen days from the date of the mailing of the postcard or letter to file statements with the director in support of or in opposition to the recommended decision. The director shall consider the additional statements and shall issue his or her final decision. The final decision may be the same as the recommended decision or may be revised in light of the additional information received in response to the recommended decision. The director shall notify affected parties of his or her final decision by mail in the form of a postcard. Notification shall include the department's website address where any person can access the full text of the director's findings, conclusions, and final decision and the full text of the final proposal. If the final decision denies the proposal in its entirety, no further action shall be taken by the director.

(6) Affected parties who do not have access to materials posted on the department's website may request notification by fax or mail.

[ 2004 c 179 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.080. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 8.]